Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Livestock

257.020.
Duties of Board of Agriculture.

The board shall:

Enforce the provisions of this chapter;

Adopt and enforce measures as it deems necessary to protect and promote the livestock, poultry, fish, and animal industries. Measures falling within the scope of KRS

257.196

shall be adopted and enforced in conformity with that section;

Prevent, control, and eradicate any communicable disease of livestock, poultry, and fish;

Investigate the prevalence of communicable diseases in livestock, poultry, and fish upon receipt of reports of those diseases;

Issue information as it deems necessary for public distribution;

Give information and instruction to farmers and breeders and feeders of livestock, poultry, and fish in the nature, cause, prevention, and control of communicable diseases; and

Regulate the importation, sale, use, and distribution of products or material used in the diagnosis, treatment, or prevention of animal diseases.

History.

63c-13: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 92, § 78; 2009, ch. 22, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 106, § 5, effective July 15, 2010.

257.030.
Powers of board.

The board may:

Cooperate with universities and other entities in conducting the necessary scientific investigations relating to the cause, nature, prevention , and treatment of communicable diseases of livestock, poultry, and fish;

Establish, maintain, and enforce any quarantine and other measures as it deems necessary in controlling the movement of livestock, poultry, and fish into, through, or within the state;

Order and enforce the cleaning and disinfection of premises and all articles and materials by which communicable diseases may be transmitted, and the destruction of diseased and exposed animals and all property and materials, as may be necessary in the eradication of disease;

Adopt, issue, and enforce administrative regulations necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, and for the accomplishment of the purposes intended to be accomplished by this chapter. Administrative regulations falling within the scope of KRS

257.196

shall be adopted, issued, and enforced in conformity with that section; and

Employ necessary scientific, field, stenographic, and clerical assistants and fix their salaries.

History.

63c-13, 63c-14: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 19, § 1; 2009, ch. 22, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 106, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.

257.040.
Places diseased animals prohibited.

No person who has in his possession any domestic animal infected with a reportable disease shall:

Permit such an animal to run at large;

Keep such an animal where other domestic animals, not affected with or previously exposed to the disease, may become infected with or exposed to it;

Permit such an animal to go on, across, or along any public highway, or in any field or lot adjacent to any public highway, or in any field through which flows a stream; or

Transport, sell, offer for sale, trade or give away such an animal, except upon permission or approval from the state veterinarian.

History.

63c-3; 2009, ch. 22, § 4, effective June 25, 2009.

257.050.
Violation of quarantine and concealing diseased animals prohibited.

No person shall willfully obstruct, evade or disregard any quarantine which the board declares, or violate any regulation for the prevention of the spread of communicable diseases among livestock, poultry, and fish, or conceal or attempt to conceal an animal infected with or exposed to a communicable disease.

History.

63c-5; 2009, ch. 22, § 5, effective June 25, 2009.

257.060.
Importation of diseased animals prohibited — Violation of regulations.

Except upon permission or approval from the state veterinarian, no person shall:

Transport or in any other way bring into this state an animal that is infected with a communicable disease or that has within the previous thirty (30) days been exposed to a communicable disease; or

Bring into this state any animal in violation of any order or regulation of the board that establishes an interstate quarantine to prevent the entrance of disease into this state.

No common carrier shall transport any animal into this state in violation of law or regulations of the board.

History.

63c-4, 63c-6; 2009, ch. 22, § 6, effective June 25, 2009.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Importation of diseased bees, quarantine against, KRS

252.200

.

257.070.
Animals to be imported according to regulations.

The movement of domestic animals from other states into this state shall be made only in compliance with regulations of the board.

Any animal brought into this state in violation of any regulation of the board shall:

Be placed in quarantine until the necessary inspection or test has been completed by a representative or agent of the board. All expenses incident to the quarantine, including the inspection and testing, shall be borne by the owner; or

Be removed from the state at the direction of the state veterinarian.

History.

63c-6; 2009, ch. 22, § 7, effective June 25, 2009.

257.075.
Swine not to be imported without certificate of immunization. [Repealed.]

257.080.
Animal diseases to be reported.

Every veterinarian, laboratory, owner, or person having knowledge of the existence of any reportable disease of livestock, poultry, or fish within the state shall immediately report the disease to the state veterinarian. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations listing all reportable diseases of livestock, poultry, and fish and setting out the conditions under which the diseases shall be reported.

History.

63c-2; 2009, ch. 22, § 8, effective June 25, 2009.

257.090.
Glandered animal — Destruction — Indemnity for. [Repealed.]

257.100.
Destruction of suffering, abandoned, or hopelessly diseased animal — “Abandonment” defined.

Any peace officer, animal control officer, or any person authorized by the board may destroy or kill or cause to be destroyed or killed, any animal found abandoned and suffering and not properly cared for, or appearing to be injured, diseased, or suffering past recovery for any useful purpose.

Before destroying the animal the officer shall obtain the judgment to that effect of a veterinarian, or of two (2) reputable citizens called by him to view the animal in his presence, or shall obtain consent to the destruction from the owner of the animal.

Any animal placed in the custody of a licensed veterinarian for treatment, boarding, or other care, which shall be unclaimed by its owner or his agent for a period of more than ten (10) days after written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, is given the owner or his agent at his last known address, shall be deemed to be abandoned and may be turned over to the nearest humane society or animal shelter or disposed of as the custodian may deem proper.

The giving of notice to the owner, or the agent of the owner of the animal by the licensed veterinarian shall relieve the licensed veterinarian and any custodian to whom the animal may be given of any further liability for disposal.

Abandonment shall constitute the relinquishment of all rights and claims by the owner to the animal.

History.

1246-2, 1246-3, 1246-4: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 109, § 1; 1980, ch. 114, § 56, effective July 15, 1980; 2004, ch. 189, § 27, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 22, § 9, effective June 25, 2009.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Cattle, horse, ass or mule, constable’s fee for killing and burying, KRS

64.190

.

257.105.
Sale of unclaimed animals held by veterinarian.

In addition to KRS

257.100

or any other provision authorized by law, any unclaimed animal held by a licensed veterinarian for more than ten (10) days of veterinary care and treatment requested by the owner or lawful possessor of the animal may be summarily sold by the veterinarian for the reasonable value of the animal upon compliance with the procedures set forth in this section.

The veterinarian under subsection (1) of this section shall give written notice of the required payment for services performed and notice of the proposed sale of the animal to the owner or lawful possessor of the animal and to any lienholders of record by certified mail. If the whereabouts of the owner or lawful possessor of the animal cannot be ascertained with reasonable diligence, a notice of the proposed sale shall be published in a newspaper, qualified under KRS

424.120

, circulated in the county where the animal is located at least ten (10) days preceding the sale. The notice shall state the amount due and the date, place and time of sale.

The proceeds of a sale under this section shall first be used to reimburse the veterinarian for an amount equal to the reasonable value of the veterinary care and treatment, plus any other care and board given the animal; the excess amount, if any, from a sale shall be paid to the owner or lawful possessor of the animal or to other persons legally entitled thereto. If the proceeds from the sale fail to cover the amount owed the veterinarian, the owner or lawful possessor of the animal shall remain liable for the unpaid portion.

A sale under this section shall not relieve the owner or lawful possessor of the animal from any other obligation to the veterinarian.

Any veterinarian making a sale provided for in this section shall make a sworn statement setting forth the following:

The kind and number of animals sold;

The amount realized from any such sale;

The amount claimed due by the veterinarian;

The name of the former owner or lawful possessor requesting the care and treatment performed by the veterinarian on the animal or animals sold;

The dates when the treatment was commenced and was completed;

The date or dates when notice of the proposed sale was given the owner or lawful possessor of the animal or animals sold;

The description or the identification number of the animal or animals sold, and if branded, the brand thereon;

The name and address of the veterinarian making the sale; and

The name and address of the purchaser of the animal or animals sold.

The record shall be filed within five (5) days of the sale in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the sale is made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 452, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 22, § 10, effective June 25, 2009.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Schneiter, Equine Statutory Liens, Vol. 67, No. 4, July 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 23.

257.110.
Board may have diseased animals destroyed or slaughtered.

When the board or any of its authorized agents determines that any domestic animal is infected with or exposed to any communicable disease and that to prevent the spread of disease it is necessary to destroy or slaughter that animal, the animal shall be destroyed or slaughtered, and the owner indemnified as provided in KRS

257.120

.

History.

63c-7: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 97, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

257.115.
Retest for brucellosis — Application, effect of negative finding. [Repealed.]

257.120.
Indemnity for destruction or slaughter of animal.

Indemnities shall be paid by the state or federal government for animals mandated to be destroyed or slaughtered on account of a reportable or United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) program disease. The indemnities shall be based on fair market value as determined by the USDA or independent appraisal.

No state-funded indemnity shall be paid for any animal unless it was the property of the person claiming indemnity, and was within the state, for a period of at least six (6) months prior to the time of the first test, except when animals are destroyed or slaughtered on account of a foreign animal or zoonotic disease.

No indemnity shall be paid for any animal:

Owned by the United States, the state or any county or city;

Brought into this state in violation of the law or any regulation of the board;

When the owner at the time of coming into possession of the animal had any reason to believe that it was infected; or

When the board or its authorized agents have satisfactory evidence that the owner has been guilty of negligence in permitting the animal to become exposed to the communicable disease.

History.

63c-7: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 296, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 310, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2009, ch. 22, § 11, effective June 25, 2009.

257.130.
Indemnity for materials destroyed.

In case of an epizootic of such character as to necessitate the destruction of property or materials to prevent the spread of disease, the property or materials shall be destroyed and indemnities paid as provided for in KRS

257.110

,

257.120

,

257.140

, and

257.150

.

History.

63c-7: amend Acts 1990, ch. 97, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 22, § 12, effective June 25, 2009.

257.140.
Premises to be disinfected before indemnities paid.

The owner shall, before indemnities are paid, thoroughly clean and disinfect the premises and any animal that has been exposed to infection, as the board, or its authorized agent, may determine. The disinfection shall be done at the expense of the owner and under the supervision of the board or its authorized agent.

History.

63c-7: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 97, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

257.150.
Payment of state indemnity.

After carcass disposal, cleaning, and disinfection has been completed, the board shall execute a voucher upon the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the amount of the indemnity due the owner, for payment from funds appropriated for this purpose. The voucher shall be approved by the state veterinarian and the chairman of the board. When the check for payment is issued by the State Treasurer, he shall forward it to the chairman of the board who shall pay it to the owner.

History.

63-7: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 97, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 22, § 13, effective June 25, 2009.

257.160.
Disposition of carcasses — How and when made.

All carcasses of domestic livestock, poultry, and fish which have died or which have been destroyed on account of any disease, except as determined and permitted by the state veterinarian or other representative of the board, shall be disposed of by:

Complete incineration of the entire carcass and all of its parts and products;

Boiling the carcass and all of its parts and products in water or heating it with steam at a temperature above boiling, continuously for two (2) hours or more;

Burying the carcass and all of its parts and products in the earth at a point which is never covered with the overflow of ponds or streams and which is not less than one hundred (100) feet distant from any watercourse, sinkhole, well, spring, public highway, residence, or stable. The carcass shall be placed in an opening in the earth at least four (4) feet deep, the abdominal and thoracic cavities opened wide their entire length with a sharp instrument, and the entire carcass covered with two (2) inches of quicklime and at least three (3) feet of earth.

Removal of the carcass by a duly-licensed rendering establishment;

Deposition of the carcass in a contained landfill approved pursuant to KRS Chapter 224;

Composting of the carcass in a facility according to the board’s administrative regulations and approved in accordance with KRS Chapter 224;

Any combination of the methods set forth in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection; or

Any other scientifically-proven method of disposal approved by the board.

The owner shall dispose of the carcass of domestic livestock, poultry, and fish as provided in subsection (1) of this section, within forty-eight (48) hours after the carcass is found unless the carcass is otherwise preserved in cold storage.

The board is authorized to promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section.

History.

63-8: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 233, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 58, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2009, ch. 22, § 14, effective June 25, 2009.

257.170.
Loading of carcasses with live animals prohibited.

An animal carcass shall not be loaded in cars, crates, boats, wagons or other vehicles containing live animals, except on special permit from the state veterinarian.

History.

63c-10; 2009, ch. 22, § 15, effective June 25, 2009.

257.180.
Importation of animal disease producing agent prohibited unless approved — Sales restricted.

No corporation, company, partnership, organization, or individual shall ship, transport, or cause to be imported into the Commonwealth of Kentucky any live unattenuated pure culture of a pathogenic bacteria, virus, or disease-producing agent of animal origin unless a permit is secured from the United States Department of Agriculture and the board. All biologics for immunization or treatment offered for sale, use, or distribution in the Commonwealth shall be approved by the United States Department of Agriculture or the board.

No live or modified live viruses, vaccines, antigens, or disease-producing organisms shall be sold to any person, firm, or corporation in the Commonwealth of Kentucky unless such person, firm, or corporation shall be a licensed veterinarian, druggist, firm, or corporation authorized under the Kentucky statutes to receive, hold, and sell biologics.

History.

63a-11(5): amend. Acts 1968, ch. 164, § 1.

257.190.
Manufacture and use of hog serum. [Repealed.]

257.192.
Kentucky Livestock Care Standards Commission — Members.

The Kentucky Livestock Care Standards Commission is hereby created to make recommendations to the board to establish, maintain, or revise standards governing the care and well-being of on-farm livestock and poultry. The commission shall be attached to the Department of Agriculture for administrative purposes and shall consist of sixteen (16) members as follows:

The state veterinarian, who shall be a nonvoting member;

The co-chairs of the Interim Joint Committee on Agriculture, who shall be nonvoting, ex officio members; and

Thirteen (13) voting members as follows:

The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee, who shall serve as chair;

The dean of the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture or the dean’s designee;

The chair of the Animal Control Advisory Board or the chair’s designee;

The director of the University of Kentucky Livestock Disease Diagnostic Center or the director of the Murray State University Breathitt Veterinary Center. Each director shall serve one (1) year terms on a rotating basis;

Four (4) members appointed by the Governor as follows:

One (1) person selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Farm Bureau;

One (1) person selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky County Judge/Executive Association;

One (1) veterinarian selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Veterinary Medical Association. The veterinarian’s practice shall include working on one (1) or more of the species named in paragraph (f) of this subsection; and

One (1) citizen at large with an interest in food safety; and

Five (5) members actively engaged in farming and appointed by the Governor with assistance by the department. The department shall contact commodity organizations named in this paragraph, collect a list of potential representatives from the organizations, and deliver the list to the Governor. The Governor shall appoint:

One (1) active producer from the list submitted by Kentucky commodity organizations representing bovine species;

One (1) active producer from the list submitted by Kentucky commodity organizations representing ovine and caprine species;

One (1) active producer from the list submitted by Kentucky commodity organizations representing porcine species;

One (1) active producer from the list submitted by Kentucky commodity organizations representing equine species; and

One (1) active producer from the list submitted by Kentucky commodity organizations representing poultry species.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 106, § 7, effective July 15, 2010.

257.194.
Terms of commission members — Meetings — Appointments — Quorum.

Initial terms of appointed members shall be staggered by the Governor. Thereafter, terms shall be for four (4) years or until their successors are duly appointed and qualified. Vacancies on the commission shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

The commission shall meet at the call of the chair or a majority of the voting members.

The Governor shall name the appointed members of the commission by August 1, 2010.

No members of the commission shall be a lobbyist as defined by KRS

11A.010

.

No appointed member of the commission shall concurrently serve on the board.

A majority of the voting members shall:

Constitute a quorum for conducting business; and

Be required in order for the commission to take any action.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 106, § 8, effective July 15, 2010.

257.196.
Commission to recommend on-farm livestock and poultry care standards to board — Approval or rejection — Administrative regulations — Construction — Preemption.

The commission shall make recommendations to the board to establish, maintain, or revise standards governing the care and well-being of on-farm livestock and poultry. The board shall approve or reject recommendations within ninety (90) days of receiving recommendations. If approved, the board shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the standards within thirty (30) days of approval. If rejected, the board shall notify the commission in writing within thirty (30) days of the rejection, and shall list the reasons for the rejection. The board shall not establish, maintain, or revise on-farm livestock and poultry care standards without a recommendation by the commission.

Before recommending on-farm livestock and poultry care standards to the board, the commission may consult with agricultural representatives from Kentucky State University, Western Kentucky University, Eastern Kentucky University, Morehead State University, and Murray State University.

When developing recommendations for on-farm livestock and poultry care standards to the board, the commission shall consider factors that include but are not limited to:

Animal well-being and agricultural best management practices;

Herd health; and

Safe, affordable, healthy food supplies for consumers.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate the regulatory authority of:

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission to inspect, investigate, and supervise horses and other participants in horse racing as provided by KRS Chapter 230 and the administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 230, or any other law applicable to the regulation of horse racing in the Commonwealth;

The Kentucky Board of Veterinary Examiners to license and certify veterinarians as provided by KRS Chapter 321 and the administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 321, or any other law applicable to the regulation of veterinarians in the Commonwealth; or

The Board of Agriculture to prevent, control, or eradicate any communicable disease of on-farm livestock or poultry as provided by this chapter and the administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter, or any other law applicable to the prevention, control, or eradication of communicable diseases of on-farm livestock or poultry.

A city, town, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local government, unified local government, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth shall not adopt any ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation regarding on-farm livestock or poultry care that is more stringent than the administrative regulations promulgated by the board under subsection (1) of this section. Local legislation in violation of this subsection is void and unenforceable.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preempt any local ordinance or regulation affecting planning and zoning adopted in accordance with KRS Chapter 100.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not affect ordinances, resolutions, rules, or regulations adopted before July 15, 2010.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 106, § 9, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). A reference to the “Kentucky Horse Racing Authority” in subsection (4) of this section, as created by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 106, sec. 9, has been changed in codification to the “Kentucky Horse Racing Commission” to reflect the reorganization of certain parts of the Executive Branch, as set forth in Executive Order 2009-535 and confirmed by the General Assembly in 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24. This change was made by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24, sec. 1938.

257.200.
Manufacture of hog serum at experiment station; sale price. [Repealed.]

257.210.
State veterinarian.

The board shall appoint the state veterinarian.

The state veterinarian shall be a licensed veterinarian who has practiced veterinary medicine for at least five (5) years prior to his or her appointment.

The state veterinarian shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until a successor has been appointed.

He or she shall be subject to removal from office by the board at any time for cause.

The office of the state veterinarian shall be in the Department of Agriculture.

History.

63c-16; 2020 ch. 13, § 1, effective March 16, 2020.

257.220.
Compensation of state veterinarian. [Repealed.]

257.230.
Functions of state veterinarian.

The state veterinarian shall be an agent of the board, shall enforce the administrative regulations of the board pertaining to livestock, poultry, and fish and, under the direction of the board, shall supervise and control the action of all deputies, inspectors, agents and specialists within the Office of the State Veterinarian. He or she shall devote his or her entire time to the duties of the office. He or she shall recommend from time to time such changes in the administrative regulations of the board, as he or she deems necessary, and do all other things necessary and proper for the successful enforcement of this chapter.

History.

63c-16, 63c-17; 2021 ch. 150, § 2, effective March 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 215, § 8, effective July 14, 2022.

257.240.
Deputy state veterinarian.

Upon the recommendation of the state veterinarian, the board may within its discretion appoint a deputy state veterinarian.

The deputy state veterinarian shall hold office for a term of four (4) years and until a successor has been elected and qualified. He or she shall be subject to removal from office by the board at any time for cause.

The deputy state veterinarian shall be a licensed veterinarian who has practiced veterinary medicine for at least three (3) years prior to his or her appointment.

History.

63c-16: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 123, § 29; 2020 ch. 13, § 2, effective March 16, 2020.

257.250.
Functions of deputy state veterinarian.

The deputy state veterinarian shall assist the state veterinarian in the enforcement of the regulations of the board, and shall in the absence or incapacity of the state veterinarian be executive agent of the board with the same duties and powers as the state veterinarian. He shall devote his entire time to the duties of his office.

History.

63c-17.

257.260.
State livestock inspector. [Repealed.]

257.270.
Board may employ veterinarians.

The board may employ veterinarians for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

63c-13: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 196, § 2; 1948, ch. 20; 1982, ch. 310, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

257.280.
County livestock inspector. [Repealed.]

257.290.
Functions of county livestock inspector. [Repealed.]

257.300.
Board may cooperate with other agencies.

The board may cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture and with officials in charge of livestock, poultry, and fish sanitation in other states, or with any other agency that, in the opinion of the board, is for the best interests of the livestock, poultry, and fish industries, in maintaining interstate quarantine and in the prevention, control and eradication of any communicable disease in livestock, poultry, and fish.

History.

63c-15; 2009, ch. 22, § 16, effective June 25, 2009.

257.310.
Birds that carry disease to be destroyed. [Repealed.]

257.315.
Administrative regulations relating to ratites.

The Board of Agriculture shall promulgate administrative regulations relating to the health of, and disease control in, ratites.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 68, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.